Hawaii statutes.
§46-15.9 Traffic regulation; repair and
maintenance; public right to use public streets, roads, or highways whose
ownership is in dispute. (a) Any provision of law to the contrary
notwithstanding, any county and its authorized personnel may impose and enforce
traffic laws and shall enforce chapters 249; 286; 287; 291; 291C; 291E; 431,
articles 10C and 10G; and 486, part III on public streets, roads, or highways
whose ownership is in dispute between the State and the county.

(b) Any provision of the law to the contrary
notwithstanding, any county and its authorized personnel may repair or
maintain, in whole or in part, public streets, roads, or highways whose
ownership is in dispute between the State and the county.

(c) No presumption that a county owns a
particular street, road, or highway shall arise as a result of the county's
performance of the activities allowed by subsection (a) or (b).

(d) The general public shall have the
unrestricted right to use public streets, roads, or highways whose ownership is
in dispute between the State and the county to access the shoreline and other
public recreational areas; provided that this subsection shall not apply to any
private street, road, or highway whose ownership is in dispute.

(e) As used in this section:

"Public recreational area" means
coastal and inland recreational areas, including beaches, shores, public parks,
public lands, public trails, and bodies of water opened to the public for
recreational use. [L 2008, c 56, §2; am L 2010, c 153, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next